New Jersey, session 222, S2465.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Commissioner of Transportation shall designate State Highway Route 10, extending from milepost 0.0 to milepost 23.51, as the American Legion Memorial Highway. 2.    State or other public funds shall not be used for producing, purchasing, or erecting signs bearing the designation established pursuant to section 1 of this act.  The Commissioner of Transportation is authorized to receive gifts, grants, or other financial assistance from private sources for the purpose of funding or reimbursing the Department of Transportation for the costs associated with producing, purchasing, erecting, and maintaining signs bearing the designation established pursuant to section 1 of this act and entering into agreements related thereto with private sources, including, but not limited to, non-government non-profit, educational, or charitable entities or institutions.  Work shall not proceed and funding shall not be accepted by the Department of Transportation until an agreement has been reached with a responsible party for paying the costs associated with producing, purchasing, erecting, and maintaining the signs. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.